Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.230

Director—Duties.

The director or the director's designee shall:

(1) Receive, administer, and disburse such gifts, grants, and endowments from private sources as may be made in trust or otherwise for the purposes of RCW 27.34.200 through 27.34.220 or the federal act; and

(2) Develop and implement a cultural resource management plan.

[ 2005 c 333 s 15; 1986 c 266 s 12; 1983 c 91 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.